Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Water Transportation

174.200.
Water Transportation Advisory Board — Members — Officers — Meetings.

The Water Transportation Advisory Board is established as an advisory body to the executive and legislative branches of government on matters pertaining to water transportation.

The Water Transportation Advisory Board shall be composed of seven (7) members, to be appointed as follows:

Four (4) members representing the Commonwealth’s public riverports, to be appointed by the Governor from a list of eight (8) nominees supplied by the Kentucky Association of Riverports. The Governor shall give consideration to including a representative from each river containing an operating public riverport;

Two (2) at-large members, to be appointed by the Governor from the private sector associated with the waterways industry; and

One (1) member representing Kentuckians for Better Transportation, to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees supplied by that organization.

After the initial appointments, members of the Water Transportation Advisory Board shall serve terms of four (4) years. Members shall be eligible to succeed themselves and shall serve until their successor is appointed.

Members of the Water Transportation Advisory Board shall not be paid for their service as board members, and shall not be reimbursed for any expenses involved in attending board meetings.

The Water Transportation Advisory Board shall elect a chair and a vice chair from its members who shall serve in those capacities until replaced. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business. The board shall be subject to the provisions of the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

The Water Transportation Advisory Board shall meet biennially, or when called by the chair, or at the request of the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet. The board shall receive assistance in carrying out its administrative functions from the Transportation Cabinet and shall be attached to the Transportation Cabinet for administrative purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 56, sec. 5, sets forth the initial terms for members of the Water Transportation Advisory Board established by this section.

174.205.
Duties of Water Transportation Advisory Board.

The Water Transportation Advisory Board shall:

Advise the Transportation Cabinet, the Cabinet for Economic Development, the Governor’s Office, and the General Assembly on matters relating to water transportation;

Recommend action to enable the Commonwealth to make best use of its waterways and riverports for future economic growth;

Assist in defining the duties and functions of positions within state government responsible for water transportation;

Recommend criteria for setting priorities for funding riverport marketing initiatives under the riverport marketing assistance trust fund established in KRS

154.80-140

;

Evaluate applications submitted by riverports for grants under the riverport marketing assistance trust fund and make recommendations to the granting authority on the disbursement of those funds;

Recommend criteria for setting priorities for funding riverport improvements under the riverport financial assistance trust fund established in KRS

174.210

; and

Evaluate applications submitted by riverports for grants under the riverport financial assistance trust fund and make recommendations to the granting authority on the disbursement of those funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 56, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

174.210.
Riverport financial assistance trust fund — Contributions — Purpose — Grants — Annual report.

There is created a riverport financial assistance trust fund, to be administered by the Transportation Cabinet.

The riverport financial assistance trust fund may receive appropriations, federal funds, contributions, gifts, and donations.

The purpose of the riverport financial assistance trust fund shall be to improve riverport facilities and infrastructure, to capture the economic and trade potential offered by water transportation. To the extent funds are available, the fund shall make grants to riverport authorities for new construction and major replacement or repair projects, including but not limited to improvement of docks, wharves, equipment, port buildings, storage facilities, roads and railroads to facilitate the flow of commerce through the port, other on-site improvements, and related professional services. Eligible projects shall not include routine operations, maintenance, or repair activities.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, moneys remaining in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Interest earned on any moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund. Amounts from the fund shall be disbursed and expended in accordance with this section.

To be eligible for a grant under this section, the applicant shall provide at least a twenty percent (20%) match, which may be obtained from any public or private source.

Grant applications shall be reviewed and awarded annually.

The Transportation Cabinet shall submit all applications to the Water Transportation Advisory Board established by KRS

174.200

for evaluation and recommendations prior to awarding any grant funding under this section.

Priority shall be given to applicants with a riverport master plan, for capital-intensive projects for which permits have been obtained, and for projects for which matching funds have been obtained.

The Transportation Cabinet shall submit on an annual basis a report detailing all grants awarded under this section to the Water Transportation Advisory Board, the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation, and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 56, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(9/24/2015). The phrase “Notwithstanding KRS 45.299” in subsection (4) of this statute has been changed to “Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

.” This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS

7.136

.